vi: Loại di động: Chân/bánh xe có thể thay đổi; Bánh xe lăn; Chân cố định; Khác
hu: Mobilitás típusa: Cserélhető lábak/görgők; Görgős kerekek; Rögzített lábak; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de mobilidade: Pés/rodízios intercambiáveis; Rodízios giratórios; Pés fixos; Outro
sv: Underredestyp: Utbytbara fötter/hjul; Rullande hjul; Stationära fötter; Övrigt
de: Mobilitätstyp: Austauschbare Füße/Rollen; Laufrollen; Standfüße; Sonstiges
en: Mobility type: Interchangeable feet/casters; Rolling casters; Stationary feet; Other
nb: Mobilitetstype: Utskiftbare føtter/hjul; Rullehjul; Stasjonære føtter; Annet
el: Τύπος κινητικότητας: Εναλλάξιμα πόδια/ροδάκια; Τροχήλατα ροδάκια; Σταθερά πόδια; Άλλο
es: Tipo de movilidad: Patas/ruedas intercambiables; Ruedas giratorias; Patas fijas; Otros
lt-LT: Mobilumo tipas: Keičiamos kojelės/ratukai; Riedantys ratukai; Stacionarios kojelės; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de mobilidade: Pés/rodízios intermutáveis; Rodízios móveis; Pés fixos; Outro
tr: Hareketlilik tipi: Değiştirilebilir ayak/tekerlek; Döner tekerlekler; Sabit ayaklar; Diğer
nl: Mobiliteitstype: Verwisselbare poten/zwenkwielen; Rollende zwenkwielen; Stationaire poten; Andere
ro-RO: Tip mobilitate: Picioare/roți interschimbabile; Roți pivotante; Picioare fixe; Altele
fr: Type de mobilité: Pieds/roulettes interchangeables; Roulettes mobiles; Pieds fixes; Autre
cs: Typ mobility: Zaměnitelné nožky/kolečka; Pojízdná kolečka; Pevné nožky; Jiné
zh-CN: 移动性类型: 可互换支脚/脚轮; 滚动脚轮; 固定支脚; 其他
ja: 可動性タイプ: 交換可能フット/キャスター; ローリングキャスター; 固定フット; その他
sk-SK: Typ mobility: Vymeniteľné nožičky/kolieska; Otočné kolieska; Pevné nožičky; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta mobilnosti: Izmjenjive nožice/kotačići; Kotačići; Stacionarne nožice; Ostalo
pl: Typ mobilności: Wymienne nóżki/kółka; Kółka jezdne; Nóżki stacjonarne; Inne
it: Tipo di mobilità: Piedini/ruote intercambiabili; Ruote girevoli; Piedini fissi; Altro
fi: Liikkuvuustyyppi: Vaihdettavat jalat/pyörät; Rullat; Kiinteät jalat; Muu
da: Mobilitetstype: Udskiftelige fødder/hjul; Rullehjul; Stationære fødder; Andet
zh-TW: 移動類型: 可替換腳座/滾輪; 滾動滾輪; 固定腳座; 其他
th: ประเภทการเคลื่อนย้าย: ขาตั้ง/ล้อเปลี่ยนได้; ล้อหมุน; ขาตั้งอยู่กับที่; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип мобильности: Сменные ножки/колёсики; Поворотные колёсики; Стационарные ножки; Другой
ko: 이동성 유형: 교체 가능한 다리/캐스터; 롤링 캐스터; 고정식 다리; 기타
sl-SI: Tip mobilnosti: Zamenljive noge/kolesa; Kolesa za premikanje; Nepremikajoče noge; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип мобилност: Сменяеми крачета/колелца; Подвижни колелца; Стационарни крачета; Други